Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1208
Installation of pumps and pumping equipment, defined.

Installation of pumps and pumping equipment shall mean the procedure employed in the placement and preparation for operation of pumps and pumping equipment at the water well location, including connecting all wiring to the first control and all construction or repair involved in making entrance to the water well, which involves the breaking of the well seal.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 40;

Laws 2006, LB 508, § 4.